Missouri, session 2026, HB2100.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 77.030 and 77.370, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 77.030 and 77.370, to read as follows:
77.030. 1. Unless it elects to be governed by subsection 2 of this section, the council
shall by ordinance divide the city into not less than four wards, and two [councilmen] council
members shall be elected from each of such wards by the qualified voters thereof at the first
election for [councilmen] council members in cities hereafter adopting the provisions of this
chapter; the one receiving the highest number of votes in each ward shall hold [his] office for
two years, and the one receiving the next highest number of votes shall hold [his] office for
one year; but thereafter each ward shall elect annually one [councilman] council member,
who shall hold [his] office for two years.
2. In lieu of electing [councilmen] council members as provided in subsection 1 of
this section, the council may elect to establish wards and elect [councilmen] council
membersas provided in this subsection. If the council so elects, it shall, by ordinance, divide
the city into not less than four wards, and one [councilman] council member shall be elected
from each of such wards by the qualified voters thereof at the first election for [councilmen]
council members held in the city after it adopts the provisions of this subsection. At the first
election held under this subsection the [councilmen] council members elected from the odd-
numbered wards shall be elected for a term of one year and the [councilmen] council
members elected from the even-numbered wards shall be elected for a term of two years. At
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2100 2
each annual election held thereafter, successors for [councilmen] council members whose
terms expire in such year shall be elected for a term of two years.
3. (1) Council members may serve four-year terms if the two-year terms provided
under subsection 1 or 2 of this section have been extended to four years by approval of a
majority of the voters voting on the proposal.
(2) The ballot of submission shall be in substantially the following form:
Shall the terms of council members which are currently set at two years
in ______ (city) be extended to four years for members elected after
August 28, 2013?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
(3) If a majority of the voters voting approve the proposal authorized in this
subsection, the members of council who would serve two years under subsections 1 and 2 of
this section shall be elected to four-year terms beginning with any election occurring after
approval of the ballot question.
4. (1) A city of the third classification may adopt term limits for the office of
council member as provided in this subsection as follows:
(a) The governing body of a city that desires to adopt term limits as provided in
this subsection shall, by order, ordinance, or resolution, vote on the question of adopting
such term limits. Upon the approval of the question by a majority of the total number of
city council members, the governing body shall submit the question to the registered
voters of the city for approval or rejection of the adoption of such term limits on the next
day available for an election in such city; or
(b) If the governing body of a city receives a petition, signed by at least ten
percent of the number of registered voters of the city voting in the last election for
mayor, calling for the city to adopt term limits as provided in this subsection, the
governing body shall submit the question to the registered voters of the city for approval
or rejection of the adoption of such term limits on the next day available for an election
in such city.
(2) If a majority of the registered voters of the city voting on a question
submitted under subdivision (1) of this subsection approve the adoption of term limits,
the office of council member shall be subject to the term limits described in subdivision
(3) of this subsection. If a majority of the registered voters of the city voting on the
question reject the adoption of term limits, no term limits as described in this subsection
shall apply.
(3) Term limits adopted under this subsection shall apply to the office of council
member as follows:

HB 2100 3
(a) A council member subject to term limits shall be ineligible to hold the office
of council member after serving four terms of office as council member; and
(b) Such term limits shall apply to terms beginning on or after the date on which
such term limits are adopted by the voters.
77.370. 1. Except as hereinafter provided, the following officers shall be elected by
the voters of the city: mayor, police judge, attorney, assessor, collector, treasurer and, except
in cities which adopt the merit system police department, a marshal.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of this section, in cities which
contract with another entity for police service, the city council may eliminate the office of
marshal.
3. The attorney shall be a person licensed to practice law in Missouri, and the council,
by ordinance, may provide for the appointment of an attorney, by the mayor with the approval
of the council, in lieu of electing an attorney. If so appointed [he] such attorney shall serve
at the pleasure of the mayor and council.
4. Whenever a city contracts for the assessment of property or the collection of taxes
with either a public or private entity as authorized by section 70.220, the city council may by
ordinance provide that at the expiration of the term of the then city assessor or collector, as
the case may be, the office is abolished and thereafter no election shall be had to fill the
office; except that in the event the contract expires and, for any reason, is not renewed, the
council may by ordinance provide for the election of such officer at the next and succeeding
regular elections for municipal officers.
5. The term of office for each of the officers is two years except the office of mayor
and the marshal which are four-year terms. All officers hold office until their successors are
duly elected or appointed and qualified.
6. The council, by ordinance, may provide that any officer of the city except the
mayor and the councilmen shall be appointed instead of elected. Such ordinance shall set the
manner of appointment, in accordance with section 77.330, and the term of office for each
appointive officer, which term shall not exceed four years.
7. (1) A city of the third classification may adopt term limits for the office of
mayor as provided in this subsection as follows:
(a) The governing body of a city that desires to adopt term limits as provided in
this subsection shall, by order, ordinance, or resolution, vote on the question of adopting
such term limits. Upon the approval of the question by a majority of the total number of
city council members, the governing body shall submit the question to the registered
voters of the city for approval or rejection of the adoption of such term limits on the next
day available for an election in such city; or

HB 2100 4
(b) If the governing body of a city receives a petition, signed by at least ten
percent of the number of registered voters of the city voting in the last election for
mayor, calling for the city to adopt term limits as provided in this subsection, the
governing body shall submit the question to the registered voters of the city for approval
or rejection of the adoption of such term limits on the next day available for an election
in such city.
(2) If a majority of the registered voters of the city voting on a question
submitted under subdivision (1) of this subsection approve the adoption of term limits,
the office of mayor shall be subject to the term limits described in subdivision (3) of this
subsection. If a majority of the registered voters of the city voting on the question reject
the adoption of term limits, no term limits as described in this subsection shall apply.
(3) Term limits adopted under this subsection shall apply to the office of mayor
as follows:
(a) A mayor subject to term limits shall be ineligible to hold the office of mayor
after serving two terms of office as mayor; and
(b) Such term limits shall apply to terms beginning on or after the date on which
such term limits are adopted by the voters.
✔